Utah statutes.
34-44-301.   Failure to pay commission.

(1)  A sales representative may bring a civil action in a court of competent jurisdiction against a principal for failure by the principal to comply with:

(a)  any provision of an agreement relating to the payment of commission; or

(b)  Subsection 34-44-202(1) or (2).

(2)  If a principal is found liable under Subsection (1), the principal is liable to the sales representative for:

(a)  three times an amount calculated by:

(i)  determining the sum of unpaid commission owed to the sales representative; and

(ii)  subtracting from the amount determined under Subsection (2)(a)(i) money the sales representative owes the principal;

(b)  reasonable attorney fees; and

(c)  court costs.



Enacted by Chapter 65, 2007 General Session

